dev/infreq-apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
    <pardef n="trip/pel__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lane</l>
          <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lar</l>
          <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>let</l>
          <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pelen</l>
          <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pelet</l>
          <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pel</l>
          <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pel</l>
          <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pel</l>
          <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/on__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ønene</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onen</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øner</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="svea/r__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="D__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>D</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="radi/us__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>usen</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="morg/on__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nane</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nar</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onane</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onar</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onen</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="døg/er__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>era</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eret</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eri</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/ong__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>engene</l>
          <r>ong<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enger</l>
          <r>ong<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onga</l>
          <r>ong<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ongi</l>
          <r>ong<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ong</l>
          <r>ong<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nuperellor__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="skam__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mer</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="vektorradius"><i>vektorradi</i><par n="radi/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sumarlæger"><i>sumarlæg</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="viktong"><i>vikt</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vekepengar"><i>vekepenga</i><par n="svea/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="søndagsmorgon"><i>søndagsmorg</i><par n="morg/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="viketong"><i>viket</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="torsdagsmorgon"><i>torsdagsmorg</i><par n="morg/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="telefontong"><i>telefont</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sommarlæger"><i>sommarlæg</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tvangsarbeidslæger"><i>tvangsarbeidslæg</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="udøger"><i>udøg</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sundagsmorgon"><i>sundagsmorg</i><par n="morg/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="systerson"><i>systers</i><par n="s/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="verson"><i>vers</i><par n="s/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stykson"><i>styks</i><par n="s/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trygdingspengar"><i>trygdingspenga</i><par n="svea/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tysdagsmorgon"><i>tysdagsmorg</i><par n="morg/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="søsterson"><i>søsters</i><par n="s/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tannstong"><i>tannst</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="soldøger"><i>soldøg</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="steson"><i>stes</i><par n="s/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svigerson"><i>svigers</i><par n="s/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sundpengar"><i>sundpenga</i><par n="svea/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bismarstong"><i>bismarst</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forfedrar"><i>forfedra</i><par n="svea/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dotterson"><i>dotters</i><par n="s/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blodskam"><i>blodskam</i><par n="skam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="husmannsson"><i>husmannss</i><par n="s/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gudson"><i>guds</i><par n="s/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fosterson"><i>fosters</i><par n="s/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brekkstong"><i>brekkst</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="handskam"><i>handskam</i><par n="skam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="haustjamdøger"><i>haustjamdøg</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drikkepengar"><i>drikkepenga</i><par n="svea/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="berelager"><i>berelag</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flyktninglæger"><i>flyktninglæg</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="felæger"><i>felæg</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barselpengar"><i>barselpenga</i><par n="svea/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="annendagsmorgon"><i>annendagsmorg</i><par n="morg/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="handeskam"><i>handeskam</i><par n="skam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fredagsmorgon"><i>fredagsmorg</i><par n="morg/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flaggstong"><i>flaggst</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fangelæger"><i>fangelæg</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="åttedagar"><i>åttedaga</i><par n="svea/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fiskestong"><i>fiskest</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bufferlager"><i>bufferlag</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fødselspengar"><i>fødselspenga</i><par n="svea/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bakrong"><i>bakr</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="annandagsmorgon"><i>annandagsmorg</i><par n="morg/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gamlepengar"><i>gamlepenga</i><par n="svea/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gardmannsson"><i>gardmannss</i><par n="s/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="adoptivson"><i>adoptivs</i><par n="s/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="glidarstong"><i>glidarst</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="andredagsmorgon"><i>andredagsmorg</i><par n="morg/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skatteutjamningsmidlar"><i>skatteutjamningsmidla</i><par n="svea/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="onsdagsmorgon"><i>onsdagsmorg</i><par n="morg/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nupperellor"><i>nupperellor</i><par n="nuperellor__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nuppereller"><i>nuppereller</i><par n="nuperellor__n"/></e>
    <e lm="samlelæger"><i>samlelæg</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="opphaldspengar"><i>opphaldspenga</i><par n="svea/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sirkelradius"><i>sirkelradi</i><par n="radi/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nuperellor"><i>nuperellor</i><par n="nuperellor__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skam"><i>skam</i><par n="skam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nupereller"><i>nupereller</i><par n="nuperellor__n"/></e>
    <e lm="primarius"><i>primari</i><par n="radi/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="reisepengar"><i>reisepenga</i><par n="svea/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="påskemorgon"><i>påskemorg</i><par n="morg/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rørtong"><i>rørt</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="måndagsmorgon"><i>måndagsmorg</i><par n="morg/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="julemorgon"><i>julemorg</i><par n="morg/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="menneskeson"><i>menneskes</i><par n="s/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kynnarar"><i>kynnara</i><par n="svea/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lakrisstong"><i>lakrisst</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jolemorgon"><i>jolemorg</i><par n="morg/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kostdøger"><i>kostdøg</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kongeson"><i>konges</i><par n="s/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laurdagsmorgon"><i>laurdagsmorg</i><par n="morg/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="madam"><i>madam</i><par n="skam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="konsentrasjonslæger"><i>konsentrasjonslæg</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mobiliar"><i>mobilia</i><par n="svea/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kombinasjonstong"><i>kombinasjonst</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
